Hawaii statutes.
[§420D-4] Termination of sustainable
business corporation status. (a) A sustainable business corporation may
terminate its status as such and cease to be subject to this chapter by
amending its articles to delete the statement that the corporation is a
sustainable business corporation. An amendment pursuant to this subsection
shall not be effective unless it is adopted by at least the minimum status
vote.

(b) If a plan of merger, consolidation,
division, or share exchange would have the effect of terminating the status of
a business corporation as a sustainable business corporation, the plan shall
not be effective unless it is adopted by at least the minimum status vote. [L
2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next